Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.05.900

Construction—2017 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 735).

The provisions of chapter 1, Laws of 2017 are to be liberally construed to effectuate the intent, policies, and purposes of chapter 1, Laws of 2017.

[ 2017 c 1 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 735, approved November 8, 2016).]